New Jersey, session 221, A4849.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The county clerk of each county shall transmit to each voter who is 17 years of age and registered to vote in that county pursuant to R.S.19:31-5 an application for a mail-in ballot upon the voters 18th birthday. b.    The State shall reimburse each county for any additional direct expenditures required for the implementation of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.